pt-BR: Costura tipo: Costura dupla; Plano; Embutida; Perfil baixo; Costura em relevo; Enrolada; Outros
zh-TW: 接縫類型: 雙針縫; 平縫; 嵌入縫; 低調縫線; 凸縫; 捲縫; 其他
ru: Тип шва: Двойной шов; Плоский; Втачной; Низкопрофильный; Выпуклый; Ролевой шов; Другое
pl: Typ szwu: Podwójnie stebnowany; Płaski; Wszywany; Niskoprofilowy; Wypukły; Rolowany; Inny
el: Τύπος ραφής: Διπλοραμμένο; Επίπεδη; Εσωτερική; Χαμηλού προφίλ; Ανυψωμένη; Γυριστή; Άλλο
fi: Saumatyyppi: Kaksoistikattu; Tasosauma; Upotettu; Matalaprofiilinen; Kohotettu; Rullattu; Muu
hu: Varrattípus: Duplán varrott; Lapos; Betétes; Alacsony profilú; Kiemelkedő; Göngyölt; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de costura: Costura dupla; Plano; Embutida; Baixo perfil; Em relevo; Enrolada; Outro
fr: Type de couture: Double couture; Plate; Incrustée; Discrète; En relief; Roulottée; Autre
en: Seam type: Double stitched; Flat; Inset; Low profile; Raised; Rolled; Other
bg-BG: Вид шев: Двоен шев; Плосък; Вграден; Нисък профил; Изпъкнал; Подгънат; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta šiva: Dvojno šivano; Ploski; Vstavljen; Nizek profil; Dvignjen; Zvit; Drugo
zh-CN: 接缝类型: 双线缝合; 平缝; 嵌缝; 薄型接缝; 凸缝; 卷边缝; 其他
ja: シームタイプ: ダブルステッチ; フラット; インセット; ロープロファイル; レイズド; ロール; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta šava: Dvostruko prošiveno; Ravni; Umetnuti; Niskog profila; Izdignuti; Rolani; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de cusătură: Cusătură dublă; Plat; Aplicat; Profil redus; În relief; Rulat; Altele
sk-SK: Typ švu: Dvojito prešívané; Ploché; Vsadzované; Nízkoprofilové; Zvýšené; Rolované; Iné
vi: Loại đường may: Khâu chần đôi; Phẳng; Âm; Mảnh; Nổi; Cuộn; Khác
nl: Naadtype: Dubbel gestikt; Plat; Ingezet; Laag profiel; Verhoogd; Gerold; Overig
es: Tipo de costura: Doble costura; Plana; Insertada; De perfil bajo; Elevada; Enrollada; Otro
cs: Typ švu: Dvojitě prošité; Plochý; Všité; Nízkoprofilové; Vystouplé; Rolované; Jiné
th: ประเภทตะเข็บ: เย็บตะเข็บคู่; แบน; สอดแทรก; รูปทรงบาง; ยกสูง; ม้วน; อื่นๆ
nb: Sømtype: Dobbeltsydd; Flat; Innfelt; Lavprofil; Hevet; Rullet; Annet
tr: Dikiş tipi: Çift dikişli; Düz; İç dikiş; Düşük profilli; Kabarık; Kıvrılmış; Diğer
ko: 이음매 유형: 더블 스티치; 플랫; 인셋; 로우 프로파일; 레이즈드; 롤; 기타
da: Sømtype: Dobbeltsyet; Flad; Indsat; Lav profil; Forhøjet; Rullet; Andet
sv: Sömtyp: Dubbelsydd; Platt; Infälld; Låg profil; Upphöjd; Rullad; Övrigt
de: Nahtart: Doppelt genäht; Flach; Eingesetzt; Niedriges Profil; Erhaben; Gerollt; Sonstige
lt-LT: Siūlės tipas: Dvigubo dygsnio; Plokščia; Įleista; Žemo profilio; Iškili; Užlenkta; Kita
it: Tipo di cucitura: A doppia cucitura; Piatta; A intarsio; A basso profilo; In rilievo; Arrotolata; Altro